Utah statutes.
53-3-415.   Limitations on employment of commercial motor vehicle drivers.
(1)  An employer shall require each applicant for employment as a commercial
motor vehicle driver to provide the information required in Section 53-3-416
regarding the applicant's employment history.
(2)  An employer may not knowingly allow, permit, or authorize a driver to
drive a commercial motor vehicle during any period when the driver:
(a)  has a CDL that is suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state;
(b)  has lost the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in a state;
(c)  has been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle;
(d)  has more than one license; or
(e)  is subject to an out-of-service order.
(3)  An employer may not knowingly allow, permit, require, or authorize a
person to violate a federal, state, or local law pertaining to railroad-
highway grade crossings.
(4) (a)  An employer who violates Subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c) during the
period the driver has been disqualified under Subsection 53-3-414(9) is
subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.
(b)  An employer who is convicted of violating Subsection (2)(e) is subject to
a civil penalty of not less than $2,750 nor more than $11,000.
(c)  An employer who is convicted of violating Subsection (3) is subject to a
civil penalty of $10,000.
